Georgia, session 2025_26, SB22.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
State School Superintendent, is amended by revising Code Section 20-2-37, which is
reserved, as follows:
"20-2-37.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Federal agency' means the United States Department of Education or any other
agency, as such term is defined in 44 U.S.C. Section 3502.
S. B. 22
- 1 -

LC 49 2025
(2) 'Guidance document' means any statement of general applicability issued by a federal
agency or by an official of such federal agency that sets forth a policy on a statutory,
regulatory, or technical issue or an interpretation of a statutory or regulatory issue;
provided, however, that such term shall not include a rule or other regulatory action that
has the force and effect of law promulgated in accordance with the notice and comment
rule-making requirements of the federal Administrative Procedure Act. Such term shall
include, but shall not be limited to, advisories, announcements, bulletins, circulars,
directives, letters, manuals, memoranda, notices, policy statements, and media, news, and
press releases. Such term shall encompass all guidance materials, regardless of format,
and shall include, but shall not be limited to, audio files and recordings; documents in
digital, electronic, or hard copy format; video files and recordings; internet posts; and
software applications. Such term shall be construed broadly to effectuate the purpose and
intent of this Code section.
(b)(1) Within 15 calendar days of receiving a guidance document from a federal agency
which the State School Superintendent or Department of Education deems relevant and
applicable to the duties, responsibilities, or business of the Department of Education, the
State Board of Education, or the State School Superintendent, the Department of
Education shall publish such guidance document in accordance with the requirements of
subsection (c) of this Code section.
(2) Within 45 calendar days of receiving a guidance document provided for in
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Department of Education shall include on the
dedicated web page provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section a written response
to such guidance document that includes, at a minimum:
(A) Each federal or state statute, regulation, or rule that is addressed either expressly
or by reasonable implication, interpretation, or application in such guidance document;
(B) A description of how such guidance document will be implemented; and
S. B. 22
- 2 -

LC 49 2025
(C) Whether the State School Superintendent or the Department of Education has
communicated to the relevant federal agency any objection or exception to such
guidance document in whole or in part.
(3) Within 15 calendar days of a guidance document provided for in paragraph (1) of this
subsection being rescinded, the Department of Education shall:
(A) Clearly indicate on the dedicated web page provided for in subsection (c) of this
Code section that such guidance document has been rescinded; and
(B) Add the rescinded guidance document along with the date such guidance document
was rescinded to a separate and clearly identifiable list of rescinded guidance
documents to be maintained on the dedicated web page provided for in subsection (c)
of this Code section.
(c) All guidance documents and rescinded guidance documents which are required to be
published by the Department of Education under subsection (b) of this Code section shall
be published on a dedicated web page on the Department of Education's public website that
is clearly identifiable, readily searchable using the search tool included on such public
website, and accessible via a link that is included on the home page of such public website.
(d) Annually by August 1, the State School Superintendent shall provide in writing the
following information to the chairpersons of the House Committee on Education, the
Senate Education and Youth Committee, the House Committee on Higher Education, the
Senate Higher Education Committee, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the
Senate Appropriations Committee; the Office of Legislative Counsel; and the directors of
the Office of Planning and Budget, the House Budget and Research Office, and the Senate
Budget and Evaluation Office:
(1) The Department of Education's public website address and the link to the dedicated
web page provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section;
S. B. 22
- 3 -

LC 49 2025
(2) A complete list of guidance documents and rescinded guidance documents that are
currently published on the dedicated web page provided for in subsection (c) of this Code
section;
(3) A complete copy of the written responses provided for in paragraph (2) of
subsection (b) of this Code section; and
(4) A complete copy of each rule adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to
subsection (e) of this Code section.
(e) The State Board of Education shall be authorized to adopt rules as necessary to
implement the requirements of this Code section. Reserved."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 22
- 4 -